Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB728.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.4414 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Local boards of education, school district superintendents, administrators of state-
controlled facilities, and local and state law enforcement agencies shall cooperate to
assign one (1) or more certified school resource officers to serve each campus
where one (1) or more school buildings are used to deliver instruction to students on
a continuous basis.
(2) Local boards of education shall ensure, for each campus in the district, that at least
one (1) certified school resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time
in the school building or buildings on the campus. If sufficient funds and qualified
personnel are not available for this purpose for every campus, the local board of
education shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection on a per campus basis, as
approved in writing by the state school security marshal, until a certified school
resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time on each campus in the
district.
(3) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a local board of education may
request reimbursement from the department for up to twenty thousand dollars
($20,000) for each school that employs at least one (1) on-site full-time certified
school resource officer. The department may provide the requested
reimbursement in accordance with this subsection, if funds specified for this
purpose are available.
(4) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a local board of education that is unable
to meet the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may, after consultation
with and approval by the state school security marshal, employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide safety and security measures for
schools within the district. The use of guardians under this subsection shall not be
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
used to replace the certified school resource officer required under subsection (2) of
this section, but only to provide safety and security resources until a certified school
resource officer is available.
(5)[(4)] Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a local board of education that has
met the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide additional school safety and
security measures within the district.
(6)[(5)] Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed by a
law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police shall enter into
a memorandum of understanding with the law enforcement agency or the
Department of Kentucky State Police that specifically states the purpose of the
school resource officer program and clearly defines the roles and expectations of
each party involved in the program. The memorandum shall provide that the school
resource officer shall not be responsible for school discipline matters that are the
responsibility of school administrators or school employees.
(7)[(6)] Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed
directly by the local board of education shall adopt policies and procedures that
specifically state the purpose of the school resource officer program and clearly
define the roles and expectations of school resource officers and other school
employees.
(8)[(7)] In accordance with KRS 61.926, 527.020, and 527.070, as applicable, each
school resource officer shall be armed with a firearm, notwithstanding any
provision of local board policy, local school council policy, or memorandum of
agreement.
(9)[(8)] The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, in collaboration with the Center for
School Safety, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish, update, and maintain three (3) levels of training for
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
certification of school resource officers as follows: School Resource Officer
Training I (SRO I), School Resource Officer Training II (SRO II), and School
Resource Officer Training III (SRO III). Each level shall consist of forty (40) hours
of training, with SRO I to be completed within one (1) year of the date of the
officer's employment and SRO II and SRO III within the subsequent two (2) years.
(10)[(9)] Course curriculum for school resource officers shall include but not be limited
to:
(a) Foundations of school-based law enforcement;
(b) Threat assessment and response;
(c) Youth drug use and abuse;
(d) Social media and cyber security;
(e) School resource officers as teachers and mentors;
(f) Youth mental health awareness;
(g) Diversity and bias awareness training;
(h) Trauma-informed action;
(i) Understanding students with special needs; and
(j) De-escalation strategies.
(11)[(10)] All school resource officers with active school resource officer certification
status shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that
has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council for
school resource officers.
(12)[(11)] In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the
commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a designee may
grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,
in which to complete the training.
(13)[(12)] Any school resource officer who fails to successfully complete training
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
requirements within the specified time periods, including any approved time
extensions, shall lose his or her school resource officer certification and shall no
longer serve in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school.
(14)[(13)] When a school resource officer is deficient in required training, the
commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or his or her designee
shall notify the council, which shall notify the officer and the officer's employing
agency.
(15)[(14)] A school resource officer who has lost school resource officer certification
due solely to the officer's failure to meet the training requirements of this section
may regain certification status as a school resource officer and may resume service
in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school setting upon successful
completion of the training deficiency.
(16)[(15)] No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district
superintendent shall report to the Center for School Safety the number and
placement of school resource officers in the district. The report shall include the
source of funding and method of employment for each position.
(17)[(16)] Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to require a local
government or any of its agencies or offices to fund the school resource officer
positions required of local boards of education under this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "local government" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.8840.
(18)[(17)] Nothing in this section shall prevent a private or parochial school from
entering into a memorandum of understanding with a local law enforcement agency
or the Department of Kentucky State Police to provide school resource officers
employed by the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky
State Police.
Section 2. KRS 158.4431 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, a "Kentucky guardian" or "guardian" means an employee of
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
a local board of education who is employed for the purpose of providing school
safety and security to students and staff on a school site. A person providing
services as a guardian may only include honorably discharged veterans, retired
Kentucky state troopers, retired special and sworn law enforcement officers, and
former federal law enforcement officers. A guardian certified by the Center for
School Safety as having met all requirements of this section is deemed to be an
authorized individual under KRS 527.070(3)(f) and may be armed with a firearm on
school property.
(2) Local boards of education may employ as many guardians as the board considers
necessary for the safety and security of its schools.
(3) Prior to hiring a guardian, the local board of education shall require the applicant to
provide certification from the Center for School Safety that he or she meets all of
the following minimum requirements:
(a) Is a citizen of the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Has received a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(c) Is currently licensed under KRS 237.110 to carry a concealed weapon;
(d) Has completed and passed background checks as required pursuant to KRS
160.380(6)(a), and has not been convicted of any felony, any misdemeanor
under KRS 510.120, 510.130, 510.140, or 510.148, or a criminal attempt,
conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy,
sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct under KRS Chapter 510, or have had any
offense listed in this paragraph expunged;
(e) Has passed a medical examination completed by a licensed physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to determine if he or
she can perform the duties of a guardian;
(f) Has passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal
controlled substance or prescription drug abuse;
(g) Has passed the following examinations administered by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council:
1. A background investigation to determine the person's suitability for the
position of guardian;
2. A psychological suitability screening to determine the person's
suitability to perform guardian duties; and
3. A polygraph examination to determine the person's suitability to
perform guardian duties;
(h) Has passed the following courses provided by the Department of Criminal
Justice Training:
1. Active Shooter Response;
2. Enhanced Handgun Performance; and
3. Patrol Rifle;
(i) Has passed the marksmanship qualification requirement for a retired peace
officer as specified in KRS 237.140;
(j) Has been honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States
within the five (5) years immediately preceding an initial contract to be a
guardian as evidenced by a Department of Defense form DD 214, or is a
retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special or sworn law enforcement
officer, or former federal law enforcement officer. Each agency that employed
a retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special law enforcement officer, or
sworn law enforcement officer shall provide to the retired individual proof of
prior employment in a prompt and efficient manner, without charge to the
individual; and
(k) Has met any other requirements imposed by the local board of education,
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
which may include but are not limited to a preemployment written
examination.
(4) Each guardian shall be required to complete annual firearm proficiency testing and
shall meet the standard in the same manner as set forth in KRS 237.140(4)(a) to (c).
(5) Each guardian shall be required to complete the course requirements for School
Resource Officer Training I (SRO I) as set forth in KRS 158.4414(9)[(8)].
(6) The employing local board of education may require the completion of any
additional courses and training as determined to be necessary by the board.
(7) Any cost associated with subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall be the
responsibility of the guardian unless otherwise agreed to by the employing local
board of education. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall not charge more
to guardians for tests, assessments, or training completed than what is customarily
charged to any other type of applicant tested, assessed, or trained by the council.
(8) A local board of education employing a guardian shall collaborate with the local
police department, local sheriff, area post of the Department of Kentucky State
Police, and the state school security marshal in order to adopt school district policy
regarding:
(a) The job description of the guardian, including but not limited to the scope of
duties, responsibilities, and direct supervisor of the guardian;
(b) The uniform to be worn by guardians that would best suit the needs of the
schools while also allowing outside agencies to easily identify guardians;
(c) The procedures, processes, and chain of command to be used during an
emergency in which law enforcement agencies are called to the school; and
(d) The type of firearm and ammunition to be used by the guardian, if any.
(9) A local board of education shall be immune from civil or criminal liability in all
claims arising out of any action of a guardian.
(10) Guardians shall possess all the immunities and defenses now available or hereafter
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1910
made available under state law to sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers,
and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in
the course of their employment.
(11) Nothing in this section requires a local board of education to hire or provide
guardians. Participation by a local board of education in the use of a guardian is
voluntary and subject to the availability of local school district funds. Any local
board of education that opts to participate shall do so at its own expense.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:10 PM Jacketed